Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.350

Suspense account.

There is established in the state treasury a special account to be known as the suspense account. All moneys which heretofore have been deposited with the state treasurer in the state treasurer's suspense fund, and moneys hereafter received which are contingent on some future action, or which cover overpayments and are to be refunded to the sender in part or whole, and any other moneys of which the final disposition is not known, shall be transmitted to the state treasurer and deposited in the suspense account.

[ 1985 c 57 s 40; 1981 2nd ex.s. c 4 s 6; 1965 c 8 s 43.79.350. Prior: 1955 c 226 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1985 c 57: See note following RCW 18.04.105.

Severability—1981 2nd ex.s. c 4: See note following RCW 43.30.325.